ro-RO: Acoperire skin pentru consola de jocuri: Doar spate; Consolă și controlere; Consolă și dock; Doar consolă; Doar controlere; Doar placă frontală; Doar față; Întregul corp; Doar mâner; Altele
fi: Pelikonsolin kalvon peitto: Vain takapuoli; Konsoli ja ohjaimet; Konsoli ja telakka; Vain konsoli; Vain ohjaimet; Vain etupaneeli; Vain etupuoli; Koko vartalo; Vain kahva; Muu
fr: Surface couverte par les skins de console de jeux: Arrière seulement; Console et manettes; Console et station d'accueil; Console seulement; Manettes seulement; Façade seulement; Avant seulement; Tout le corps; Poignée seulement; Autre
ja: ゲームコンソールスキンカバレッジ: 背面のみ; 本体・コントローラー; 本体・ドック; 本体のみ; コントローラーのみ; フェースプレートのみ; 前面のみ; 全身; グリップのみ; その他
th: ความครอบคลุมสกินคอนโซลเกม: ด้านหลังเท่านั้น; คอนโซลและคอนโทรลเลอร์; คอนโซลและด็อก; คอนโซลเท่านั้น; คอนโทรลเลอร์เท่านั้น; หน้ากากเท่านั้น; ด้านหน้าเท่านั้น; ทั้งตัว; ที่จับเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
cs: Pokrytí skinu herní konzole: Pouze zadní strana; Konzole a ovladače; Konzole a dok; Pouze konzole; Pouze ovladače; Pouze čelní panel; Pouze přední strana; Celé tělo; Pouze úchopy; Jiné
es: Cobertura de la funda para consola de juegos: Solo parte trasera; Consola y controles; Consola y base; Solo consola; Solo controles; Solo placa frontal; Solo parte frontal; Cuerpo completo; Solo empuñadura; Otros
bg-BG: Покритие на обложките за игрови конзоли: Само гръб; Конзола и контролери; Конзола и док; Само конзола; Само контролери; Само лицев панел; Само предна част; Цяло тяло; Само дръжка; Други
sl-SI: Pokritost kože igralne konzole: Samo zadaj; Konzola in krmilniki; Konzola in postaja; Samo konzola; Samo krmilniki; Samo čelna plošča; Samo spredaj; Celo telo; Samo ročaj; Drugo
tr: Oyun konsolu kaplama kapsamı: Sadece arka; Konsol ve kontrolörler; Konsol ve dok; Sadece konsol; Sadece kontrolörler; Sadece ön kapak; Sadece ön; Tüm vücut; Sadece tutuş; Diğer
it: Copertura skin console giochi: Solo retro; Console e controller; Console e dock; Solo console; Solo controller; Solo frontalino; Solo fronte; Corpo intero; Solo impugnatura; Altro
da: Beskyttelsesfoliens dækning af spillekonsol: Kun bagside; Konsol og controllere; Konsol og dock; Kun konsol; Kun controllere; Kun frontplade; Kun forside; Fuld krop; Kun greb; Andet
zh-CN: 游戏机贴膜覆盖范围: 仅背面; 主机和控制器; 主机和底座; 仅主机; 仅控制器; 仅面板; 仅正面; 全身; 仅手柄; 其他
pt-BR: Cobertura da skin do console de jogos: Apenas traseira; Console e controles; Console e dock; Apenas console; Apenas controles; Apenas placa frontal; Apenas frontal; Corpo completo; Apenas empunhadura; Outro
zh-TW: 遊戲機保護貼覆蓋範圍: 僅背面; 主機控制器; 主機底座; 僅主機; 僅控制器; 僅面板; 僅正面; 全身; 僅握把; 其他
el: Κάλυψη αυτοκόλλητου κονσόλας παιχνιδιών: Μόνο πίσω; Κονσόλα και χειριστήρια; Κονσόλα και βάση; Μόνο κονσόλα; Μόνο χειριστήρια; Μόνο πρόσοψη; Μόνο μπροστά; Όλο το σώμα; Μόνο λαβή; Άλλο
de: Spielkonsolen-Skin-Abdeckung: Nur Rückseite; Konsole und Controller; Konsole und Dock; Nur Konsole; Nur Controller; Nur Frontplatte; Nur Vorderseite; Ganzkörper; Nur Griff; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Žaidimų konsolės odos dangos apimtis: Tik galinė pusė; Konsolė ir valdikliai; Konsolė ir dokas; Tik konsolė; Tik valdikliai; Tik priekinis skydas; Tik priekinė pusė; Visas kūnas; Tik rankena; Kita
nl: Gameconsole skin dekking: Alleen achterkant; Console en controllers; Console en dock; Alleen console; Alleen controllers; Alleen frontplaat; Alleen voorkant; Volledige lichaam; Alleen grip; Andere
hr-HR: Pokrivenost kože konzole za igre: Samo stražnja strana; Konzola i kontroleri; Konzola i priključna stanica; Samo konzola; Samo kontroleri; Samo prednja ploča; Samo prednja strana; Cijelo tijelo; Samo drška; Ostalo
hu: Játékkonzol dekorfólia-lefedettsége: Csak hátlap; Konzol és kontrollerek; Konzol és dokk; Csak konzol; Csak kontrollerek; Csak előlap; Csak elülső; Teljes test; Csak markolat; Egyéb
ko: 게임 콘솔 스킨 적용 범위: 뒷면만; 콘솔 및 컨트롤러; 콘솔 및 도크; 콘솔만; 컨트롤러만; 페이스플레이트만; 앞면만; 전신; 그립만; 기타
en: Game console skin coverage: Back only; Console & controllers; Console & dock; Console only; Controllers only; Faceplate only; Front only; Full body; Grip only; Other
sv: Spelkonsolskalets täckning: Endast baksida; Konsol och kontroller; Konsol och dockningsstation; Endast konsol; Endast kontroller; Endast frontplatta; Endast framsida; Hela kroppen; Endast grepp; Övrigt
ru: Покрытие наклейки для игровой консоли: Только задняя сторона; Консоль и контроллеры; Консоль и док-станция; Только консоль; Только контроллеры; Только лицевая панель; Только передняя сторона; Все тело; Только рукоятки; Другой
nb: Spillkonsoll skinndekning: Kun bakside; Konsoll og kontrollere; Konsoll og dokk; Kun konsoll; Kun kontrollere; Kun frontplate; Kun front; Hele kroppen; Kun grep; Annet
pl: Zakres pokrycia skina konsoli: Tylko tył; Konsola i kontrolery; Konsola i stacja dokująca; Tylko konsola; Tylko kontrolery; Tylko panel przedni; Tylko przód; Całe ciało; Tylko uchwyt; Inne
sk-SK: Pokrytie skinov hernej konzoly: Iba zadná strana; Konzola a ovládače; Konzola a dok; Iba konzola; Iba ovládače; Iba čelný panel; Iba predná strana; Celé telo; Iba rukoväť; Iné
vi: Phạm vi phủ skin máy chơi game: Chỉ mặt sau; Máy chơi và tay cầm; Máy chơi và đế; Chỉ máy chơi; Chỉ tay cầm; Chỉ mặt trước; Chỉ phía trước; Toàn cơ thể; Chỉ phần cầm; Khác
pt-PT: Cobertura da skin da consola de jogos: Apenas traseira; Consola e comandos; Consola e dock; Apenas consola; Apenas comandos; Apenas placa frontal; Apenas frente; Corpo inteiro; Apenas punho; Outro